Maryland, session 2025, HB0913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
– 1 –

Ch. 567 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
(vii) 2. A. Not SUBJECT TO SUBSUBSUBPARAGRAPH B OF
THIS SUBSUBPARAGRAPH, NOT more than [two] FOUR speed monitoring systems may be
placed on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City.
B. NOT MORE THAN ONE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IN
EACH DIRECTION MAY BE IN OPERATION AT THE SAME TIME ON INTERSTATE 83 IN
BALTIMORE CITY.
Chapter 628 of the Acts of 2021
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2021. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and 1 month and at the end of June
30, 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –